en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Ab Wheels & Rollers: Ab Rollers; Ab Wheels
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > ลูกกลิ้งบริหารหน้าท้อง: ลูกกลิ้งหน้าท้อง; ล้อกลิ้งหน้าท้อง
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Posilňovacie kolieska a valčeky: Posilňovacie valčeky; Posilňovacie kolieska
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Rolos e rodas para abdominais: Rolos para abdominais; Rodas para abdominais
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Kółka i wałki do ćwiczeń: Rolki do ćwiczeń mięśni brzucha; Kółka do ćwiczeń mięśni brzucha
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Träningshjul för magmuskelträning: Magmuskelrollers; Magmuskelhjul
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Ab wheels og rollere: Mageruller; Magehjul
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 健腹輪: 健腹滾輪; 腹肌健身輪
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Haskerekek és -görgők: Hasgörgők; Haskerekek
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Vatsalihaspyörät ja -rullat: Vatsalihasrullat; Vatsalihaspyörät
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Bánh xe và con lăn tập cơ bụng: Con lăn tập cơ bụng; Bánh xe tập cơ bụng
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Ruote e rulli per addominali: Rulli addominali; Ruote per addominali
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > 腹筋ローラー・ホイール: 腹筋ローラー; 腹筋ホイール
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Buikspierwielen en -rollers: Buikspierrollers; Buikspierwielen
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Roues et rollers abdominaux: Rollers abdominaux; Roues abdominales
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Rodas e rolos para abdominais: Rolos para abdominais; Rodas para abdominais
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Pilvo preso treniravimo ratukai ir voleliai: Pilvo preso treniravimo voleliai; Pilvo preso treniravimo ratukai
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Kotači i valjci za trbušnjake: Kotači za trbušnjake; Valjci za trbušnjake
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Abwheels og abrollers: Abrollers; Abwheels
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > AB 휠/롤러: AB 롤러; AB 휠
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Kolečka a válečky na posilování břišních svalů: Válečky na posilování břišních svalů; Kolečka na posilování břišních svalů
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 腹肌轮/健腹器: 健腹轮; 卷腹轮
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Τροχοί & κύλινδροι κοιλιακών: Κύλινδροι κοιλιακών; Τροχοί κοιλιακών
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Ruedas y rodillos para abdominales: Rodillos para abdominales; Ruedas para abdominales
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Колеса и ролики для пресса: Ролики для пресса; Колеса для пресса
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Bauchtrainer & -roller: Bauchroller; Bauchtrainer
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Колела и ролки за коремни мускули: Ролки за коремни мускули; Колела за коремни мускули
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Ab Wheel'lar ve Ab Roller'lar: Ab Roller; Ab Wheel
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Roți și role pentru exerciții pentru abdomen: Role pentru exerciții pentru abdomen; Roți pentru exerciții pentru abdomen
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Kolesa in valjčki za trebušne mišice: Valjčki za trebušne mišice; Kolesa za trebušne mišice